District of Columbia statutes.
8-505

Violations of § 8-502, § 8-504, or § 8-507.

Any person violating any provision of § 8-502 or § 8-507 shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than 6 months, or both. All prosecutions under this chapter, except as provided in § 8-504, shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia upon information by the Corporation Counsel or 1 of his assistants. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of § 8-502 or § 8-507, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of these sections, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of these sections shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 839, ch. 768, § 5
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 459, 32 DCR 4450
This section is referenced in § 8-506.
1981 Ed., § 6-805.
1973 Ed., § 6-605.